Tennessee, session 114, HB1485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-8-107, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
(1) The commission shall issue a certificate of compliance to a law enforcement
officer upon separation from service or retirement from the law enforcement agency that
employed the officer. Upon separation from service or retirement, the former officer is
entitled to certification annually if the former officer:
(A) Has satisfactorily completed an approved recruit training program as
required by this part;
(B) Is up to date on the former officer's annual in-service training
commensurate with the former officer's rank and responsibilities;
(C) Provides the commission with a letter of good standing upon
separation from service or retirement from the executive head of the officer's
former employing law enforcement agency for each year that the former officer
applies for certification under this subsection ( );
(D) Provides the commission annually with proof satisfactory that the
former officer is a resident of this state, including the county of residence;
(E) Pays any fee associated with the issuance or renewal of such
certification; and
HB1485
009371
- 1 -

(F) Satisfies all other requirements of the commission for certification
under this subsection ( ) after separation from service or retirement.
(2) A former law enforcement officer certified under this subsection ( ):
(A) Is not entitled to a pay supplement for such certification; and
(B) Shall notify the commission immediately upon becoming a resident of
another state or territory of the United States. Upon receipt of such notice, the
former officer is not eligible to renew the certification.
(3) The commission may promulgate rules to carry out this subsection ( ) in
accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, codified in title 4, chapter 5.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 009371